de: Ohne Polyphosphate
bg: Без полифосфати
es: Sin polifosfatos
fi: polyfosfaatiton, ilman polyfosfaatteja
fr: Sans polyphosphates
hu: Polifoszfátmentes
pt: Sem polifosfatos, sem polifosfato
ru: Полифосфаты

de: Ohne Zusatz von Polyphosphaten
fr: Sans addition de polyphosphates, Sans addition de polyphosphate, Sans polyphosphates ajoutés
pt: Sem adição de polifosfatos, sem adição de polifosfato
ru: Без добавления полифосфатов

en: Not from concentrate
da: Ikke fra koncentrat
sv: Inte från koncentrat
zh: 非浓缩还原

en: Halal
xx: Halal
bg: Халал
fr: Halal, hallal
he: חלאל
hr: halal
ru: Халяль
th: ฮาลาล
tr: Helal
zh: 清真

en: Halal Food Authority, HFA, HFA Approved, Hallal Food Authority
zh: 清真食品管理局

en: Halal Food Council of Europe, HFCE
zh: 欧洲清真食品委员会

en: Muslim Consumer Group, H-MCG
zh: 穆斯林消费者协会

en: The Central Islamic Committee of Thailand, CICOT, The Islamic Committee Office of Thailand, The Halal Standard Institute of thailand
it: Comitato Islamico Centrale della Tailandia
th: สำนักงานคณะกรรมการกลางอิสลามแห่งประเทศไทย, คณะกรรมการกลางอิสลามแห่งประเทศไทย
zh: 泰国中央伊斯兰委员会

en: Muslim Council International
zh: 国际穆斯林理事会

en: Halal Monitoring Committee, HMC
zh: 清真监督委员会

en: Junta Islamica
zh: 西班牙伊斯兰理事会

en: Islamic Food and Nutrition Council of Canada, IFANCC, Halal IFANCC Certified
zh: 加拿大伊斯兰食品与营养理事会

en: Islamic Food and Nutrition Council of America, IFANCA, Halal IFANCA Certified
zh: 美国伊斯兰食品与营养理事会

en: Eurohalal
xx: Eurohalal
zh: 欧洲清真认证

en: Halal Quality Control, HQC Halal
xx: HQC Halal
zh: 清真质量控制

fr: Label Rouge
xx: Label Rouge

en: Thai quality label
he: תווית איכות תאילנדית
zh: 泰国质量标志

en: Thailand Diversity & Refinement
zh: 泰国多样性与精细化

en: Thai fish sauce quality label
ca: Etiqueta de qualitat de salsa de peix Thai
zh: 泰国鱼露质量标志

en: First grade TIS 3-1983, Thai Industrial Standard Institute
ca: Primer grau TIS 3-1983, Institut d'Estandaritzacions Industrials Thai